test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-virpwl_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - virpõļ: # Noun 241 'eng /est täring/fin' - full paradigm
     virpõļ+N+Sg+Nom: virpõļ
     virpõļ+N+Sg+Gen: virpõļ
     virpõļ+N+Sg+Par: virpõļt
     virpõļ+N+Sg+Dat: virpõļõn
     virpõļ+N+Sg+Ins: virpõļõks
     virpõļ+N+Sg+Ill: virpõļõ
     virpõļ+N+Sg+Ela: virpõļšt
     virpõļ+N+Pl+Nom: virpõļd
     virpõļ+N+Pl+Gen: virpõļd
     virpõļ+N+Pl+Par: virpiļi
     virpõļ+N+Pl+Dat: virpõļdõn
     virpõļ+N+Pl+Ins: virpõļdõks
     virpõļ+N+Pl+Ill: virpiļiž
     virpõļ+N+Pl+Ela: virpiļist
